Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.145

Educational program for juveniles in detention facilities—Application of chapter 28A.190 RCW.

A program of education shall be provided for by the several counties and school districts of the state for common school-age persons confined in each of the detention facilities staffed and maintained by the several counties of the state under this chapter and chapters 13.16 and 13.20 RCW. The division of duties, authority, and liabilities of the several counties and school districts of the state respecting the educational programs is the same in all respects as set forth in chapter 28A.190 RCW respecting programs of education for state residential school residents. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a school district from utilizing the services of an educational service district subject to RCW 28A.310.180.

[ 2021 c 164 s 16; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 604; 2014 c 157 s 5; 1990 c 33 s 551; 1983 c 98 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Juvenile facilities, educational programs: RCW 28A.190.010.